Massachusetts, session 194th, H5188.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a special commission to study access to unemployment
insurance in the commonwealth. The commission shall study and make recommendations for
remedying timeliness and equity issues in the processing of claims for unemployment insurance.
The commission shall evaluate the structure and operations of the department of unemployment
assistance, including the current number of employees and the departmental budget, and make
recommendations to improve the department’s effectiveness in fulfilling its legislative mandate.
(b) The commission shall consist of 9 members: the secretary of labor and workforce
development, or a designee; the director of the department of unemployment assistance, or a
designee; the chairs of the joint committee on labor and workforce development, or designees;
and 5 members to be appointed by the governor, 3 of whom shall have expertise in the
administration of unemployment insurance or other social services and 2 of whom shall have
experience in pursuing a claim for unemployment insurance in the commonwealth.
of 2

SECTION 2. Not later than October 1, 2026, the commission shall file a report of its
findings, including any legislative, regulatory or budgetary recommendations, with the clerks of
the house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the joint committee on labor and workforce development.
of 2